Illinois, session 104th, HB2949.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Commemorative Dates Act is amended by 5adding Section 182 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 490/182 new)7    Sec. 182. Scarring Alopecia Awareness Month. The month of 8September of each year is designated as Scarring Alopecia 9Awareness Month, to be observed throughout the State as a 10month to promote the awareness of scarring alopecia disease 11and treatment.